Florida, session 2026, SB778.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsection (9) of section 916.106, Florida 13 Statutes, is amended to read: 14 916.106âDefinitions.âFor the purposes of this chapter, the 15 term: 16 (9)ââForensic clientâ or âclientâ means any defendant who 17 has been committed to the department or agency pursuant to s. 18 916.13, s. 916.15, or s. 916.302, or s. 916.303(3). 19 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 20 made by this act to section 916.106, Florida Statutes, in a 21 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 22 402.164, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 23 402.164âLegislative intent; definitions.â 24 (2)âAs used in this section through s. 402.167, the term: 25 (b)ââClientâ means a client of the Agency for Persons with 26 Disabilities, the Agency for Health Care Administration, the 27 Department of Children and Families, or the Department of 28 Elderly Affairs, as defined in s. 393.063, s. 394.67, s. 29 397.311, or s. 400.960, a forensic client or client as defined 30 in s. 916.106, a child or youth as defined in s. 39.01, a child 31 as defined in s. 827.01, a family as defined in s. 414.0252, a 32 participant as defined in s. 429.901, a resident as defined in 33 s. 429.02, a Medicaid recipient or recipient as defined in s. 34 409.901, a child receiving child care as defined in s. 402.302, 35 a disabled adult as defined in s. 410.032 or s. 410.603, or a 36 victim as defined in s. 39.01 or s. 415.102 as each definition 37 applies within its respective chapter. 38 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.